Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.480

Publicity board.

The publicity board administering the publicity fund shall consist of three members nominated by a recognized commercial organization in the city, then appointed by the mayor and confirmed by at least a two-thirds vote of the city council. The commercial organization must be incorporated, must be representative and public, devoted exclusively to the work usually devolving upon such organizations and have not less than two hundred bona fide dues-paying members; if more than one organization in the city meets the qualifications, the oldest one shall be designated to make the nominations.

Members of the publicity board must be resident property owners and voters in the city and after their appointment and confirmation must qualify by taking the oath of office and filing a bond with the city in the sum of one thousand dollars conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties. They shall be appointed in December and their terms shall be for one year commencing on the second Monday in January after their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any member of the board may be removed by the mayor at the request of the organization which nominated the members after a majority vote of the entire membership of the organization favoring the removal, taken at a regular meeting.

Members of the publicity board shall serve without remuneration.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.480. Prior: 1913 c 57 s 2, part; RRS s 9036, part.]